Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201679-1073
General fund property tax receipts; learning community coordinating council; certification; division; distribution; property tax refund or in lieu of property tax reimbursement; proportionality.

On or before September 1 for each year prior to 2017, each learning community coordinating council shall determine the expected amounts to be distributed by the county treasurers to each member school district from general fund property tax receipts pursuant to subdivision (2)(b) of section 77-3442 and shall certify such amounts to each member school district, the county treasurer for each county containing territory in the learning community, and the State Department of Education. Such property tax receipts shall be divided among member school districts proportionally based on the difference of the school district's formula need calculated pursuant to section 79-1007.11 minus the sum of the state aid certified pursuant to section 79-1022 and the other actual receipts included in local system formula resources pursuant to section 79-1018.01 for the school fiscal year for which the distribution is being made.

Each time the county treasurer distributes property tax receipts from the common general fund levy to member school districts, the amount to be distributed to each district shall be proportional based on the total amounts to be distributed to each member school district for the school fiscal year. Each time the county treasurer certifies a property tax refund pursuant to section 77-1736.06 based on the common general fund levy for member school districts or any entity issues an in lieu of property tax reimbursement based on the common general fund levy for member school districts, including amounts paid pursuant to sections 70-651.01 and 79-1036, the amount to be certified or reimbursed to each district shall be proportional on the same basis as property tax receipts from such levy are distributed to member school districts.

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 93;

Laws 2007, LB641, § 29;

Laws 2008, LB988, § 49;

Laws 2008, LB1154, § 11;

Laws 2009, LB392, § 14;

Laws 2009, LB545, § 23;

Laws 2010, LB1070, § 9;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 48.
July 21, 2016
Because the levy authorized under this section benefits all taxpayers in a learning community, which is the relevant taxing district, this section does not violate the constitutional prohibition in Neb. Const. art. VIII, sec. 4, against a commutation of taxes. Sarpy Cty. Farm Bureau v. Learning Community, 283 Neb. 212, 808 N.W.2d 598 (2012).

Because the levy distributed under this section is uniform throughout the entire learning community, which is the relevant taxing district, this section does not violate the uniformity clause in Neb. Const. art. VIII, sec. 1. Sarpy Cty. Farm Bureau v. Learning Community, 283 Neb. 212, 808 N.W.2d 598 (2012).

This section was enacted for substantially local purposes, and therefore, it does not violate the prohibition in Neb. Const. art. VIII, sec. 1A, against a property tax for a state purpose. Sarpy Cty. Farm Bureau v. Learning Community, 283 Neb. 212, 808 N.W.2d 598 (2012).